firefox-addon/dictionaries/tr.dic
adaptör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
akümülatör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
alttür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
anayön/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
aranjör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
arnavutköy/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
atasözü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
babaköş/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
barbekü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
başörtüsü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
beylikdüzü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
blöf/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
broşür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
böcü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
bölüşüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
bügdüz/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
bülbül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
bütün/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
büzgü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
cücük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
defibratör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
denizköpüğü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
devetüyü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
dizüstü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
döküntü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
dönüştürüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
dörtyüzlü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
dük/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
dünür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
düttürü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
düzlük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
düşük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
düşüt/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
eltieltiyeküstü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
epikürcü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
fabrikatör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
fikstür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
formatör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
fötr/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
garantör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gravür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gökçül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gömültü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
görü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
görüş/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
göz/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
göğüs/∕∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
güldürü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gümrük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gün/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖≅⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
günkü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
gürül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
güç/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
herkül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
hödük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
hüngürtü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
hırgür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
iskorbüt/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
işbölümü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
jüt/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kalehöyük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
karagümrük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
katgüt/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kireçsütü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kompozitör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
konjonktür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
konvertisör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kreatör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
Kulüp/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kuştüyü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kömüş/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kösnü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kükürt/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kümülüs/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
küratör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
küskün/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kütük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
kızılgöz/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
lüp/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
menekşegülü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
minör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
mü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
navigatör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
omnibüs/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
pasör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
portör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
püklüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
pütür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
reseptör/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
sarıgöl/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
sinüs/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
sönüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
sülük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
sürç/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
taaddüt/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tahassür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tazallüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tecanüs/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
teessüs/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
teheyyüç/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tellür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tenasül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
teressüp/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tevekkül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
teşekkül/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tröst/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
tüm/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
türüz/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
vezirköprü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
yalıngöz/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
yün/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
yıldönümü/∋∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
çerçöp/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
çörtük/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
öd/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
ömür/√∃≢∦≊∬∢≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
örgü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
öykü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
öğüt/≐∦≊∢≈∹≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
Üssü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
üşüntü/∜≦≽∦≊≭≩≈∹≃∳∷∾≆≧∧∨≌∌≋∗∘∖⊖⊗⊘⊙⊚⊛⊜⊝
